src/scripts/Polish/gpos.foma
# Copyright (C) 2012  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define Conjunction 
a | 
inaczej | 
jakoby | 
niby | 
jakby | 
aby | 
jeśli | 
jeżeli | 
natomiast | 
za to | 
z drugiej strony | 
i | 
oraz | 
lub | 
albo | 
czy | 
bądź | 
lecz | 
jednak | 
jednakże | 
póki | 
dopóki | 
póty | 
dopóty | 
póki co | 
ponieważ | 
ponadto | 
oprócz | 
także | 
też | 
to | 
choć | 
chociaż | 
chociażby | 
toteż | 
więc | 
choćby | 
żeby;

define Preposition 
bez | 
blizko | 
w | 
zamiast | 
вe | 
obok | 
przy | 
koło | 
dookoła | 
w rodzaju | 
dla | 
do | 
Za | 
z | 
spod | 
oprócz | 
między | 
pomiędzy | 
mimo | 
pomimo | 
na | 
nad | 
naprzeciw | 
odnośnie | 
o | 
około | 
od | 
oto | 
przed | 
przede | 
po | 
pod | 
przy | 
przeciw | 
przeciwko | 
s | 
prócz | 
przez | 
później | 
spośród | 
w | 
przez;

define Particle 
kolwiek | 
bądź | 
niebądź | 
aż | 
by | 
przecież | 
oto | 
otóż | 
właśnie | 
tak | 
nawet | 
niby | 
że | 
mianowicie | 
czy | 
dopiero | 
tylko | 
ledwie | 
Nie | 
ani | 
niech | 
niechaj | 
niechajże | 
chyba | 
naprawdę | 
może | 
już | 
aczkolwiek | 
to | 
jakoby;

define Relative 
gdzie | 
dlaczego | 
jak | 
jaka | 
jakie | 
jakim | 
jakich | 
jaki | 
jaka | 
jakie | 
jakiego | 
jakiej | 
jakiemu | 
jaką | 
jacy | 
jakim | 
jakimi | 
jakiego | 
jakie | 
jaki | 
jakiemu | 
jaka | 
kim | 
kiedy | 
кого | 
кому | 
która | 
którego | 
które | 
której | 
którym | 
któremu | 
którą | 
które | 
który | 
którym | 
którymi | 
których | 
kto | 
dokąd | 
skąd | 
dlaczego | 
ile | 
czego | 
czyj | 
czym | 
czemu | 
co | 
czyjego | 
czyjej | 
czyjemu | 
czyj | 
czyjim | 
czyjimi | 
czyjih | 
czyją | 
czyja | 
czyje | 
czym;

define Personal 
wam | 
wami | 
was | 
wy | 
jego | 
jej | 
jemu | 
niej | 
im | 
nimi | 
ich | 
mnie | 
mną | 
mi | 
nam | 
nami | 
nas | 
niego | 
niej | 
niemu | 
niej | 
nim | 
nimi | 
nich | 
nią | 
on | 
ona | 
oni | 
ono | 
one | 
ciebię | 
cię | 
tobą | 
ci | 
ty | 
ja;

define Possessive 
Wasz | 
wasza | 
wasze  |  
waszego | 
waszej | 
waszemu | 
waszej | 
waszych | 
waszym | 
waszymi | 
waszych | 
waszą | 
mojego | 
mojej | 
mojemu | 
mojej | 
moi | 
moim | 
moimi | 
moich | 
mój | 
moja | 
moje | 
nasz | 
nasza | 
nasze  |  
naszego | 
naszej | 
naszemu | 
naszą | 
nasi | 
naszym | 
naszymi | 
naszych | 
naszą | 
swojego | 
swojej | 
swojemu | 
swojej | 
swoi | 
swoimi | 
swoich | 
swój | 
swoja | 
swoje | 
swoją | 
swoich | 
twojego | 
twojej | 
twojemu | 
twoją | 
twoi | 
twoim | 
twoimi | 
twoich | 
twój | 
twoją | 
twoja;

define FunctionWord Conjunction | Preposition | Particle | Relative | Personal | Possessive;

regex 
Conjunction -> conj || _ ,, 
Preposition -> prep || _ ,, 
Particle -> part || _ ,, 
Relative -> rel || _ ,, 
Personal -> pers || _ ,, 
Possessive -> pos || _ ,, 
\FunctionWord -> content || _ ; 
